Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.770

State opioid response plan.

The secretary shall be responsible for coordinating the statewide response to the opioid epidemic and executing the state opioid response plan, in partnership with the health care authority. The department and the health care authority must collaborate with each of the agencies and organizations identified in the state opioid response plan.

[ 2019 c 314 s 12.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.